Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,306
Claims; when barred; exclusive remedy.

Except as provided in section 25-213, every contract claim permitted under the State Contract Claims Act shall be forever barred unless the claim is filed with the Risk Manager within two years of the time at which the claim accrued. The State Contract Claims Act shall provide the exclusive remedy for resolving contract claims.

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 56.

For purposes of this section, the claim accrues when an injury occurs and the injured party has the right to seek redress by instituting and maintaining a lawsuit. Baldwin Carpet v. Builders, Inc., 3 Neb. App. 40, 523 N.W.2d 33 (1994).